District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1805.51

Technical assistance.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [262], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2551
June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-123, § 222(a), 53 DCR 2843

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2853.51.